Utah statutes.
53-2a-203.   Definitions.

(1)  "Chief executive officer" means:

(a)  for a municipality:

(i)  the mayor for a municipality operating under all forms of municipal government except the council-manager form of government; or

(ii)  the city manager for a municipality operating under the council-manager form of government;

(b)  for a county:

(i)  the chair of the county commission for a county operating under the county commission or expanded county commission form of government;

(ii)  the county executive officer for a county operating under the county-executive council form of government; or

(iii)  the county manager for a county operating under the council-manager form of government; or

(c)  for a special service district:

(i)  the chief executive officer of the county or municipality that created the special service district if authority has not been delegated to an administrative control board as provided in Section 17D-1-301;

(ii)  the chair of the administrative control board to which authority has been delegated as provided in Section 17D-1-301; or

(iii)  the general manager or other officer or employee to whom authority has been delegated by the governing body of the special service district as provided in Section 17D-1-301; or

(d)  for a local district:

(i)  the chair of the board of trustees selected as provided in Section 17B-1-309; or

(ii)  the general manager or other officer or employee to whom authority has been delegated by the board of trustees.

(2)  "Local emergency" means a condition in any municipality or county of the state which requires that emergency assistance be provided by the affected municipality or county or another political subdivision to save lives and protect property within its jurisdiction in response to a disaster, or to avoid or reduce the threat of a disaster.

(3)  "Political subdivision" means a municipality, county, special service district, or local district.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

